Idaho, session 2025, H0380.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 15, Title 18, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 18-1508B, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
18-1508B. AGGRAVATED LEWD CONDUCT WITH MINOR CHILD UNDER SIXTEEN. Any
person eighteen (18) years of age or older who commits any lewd or lasciv-
ious act or acts on or with the body or any part or member thereof of a mi-
nor child under sixteen (16) years of age but thirteen (13) years of age or
older, including but not limited to genital-genital contact, oral-genital
contact, anal-genital contact, oral-anal contact, manual-anal contact, or
manual-genital contact, whether between persons of the same or opposite sex,
or who involves such minor child in any act of bestiality or sadomasochism as
defined in section 18-1507, Idaho Code, when any of such acts are done with
the intent of arousing, appealing to, or gratifying the lust or passions or
sexual desires of such person, such minor child, or a third party shall be
guilty of felony aggravated lewd conduct with a minor child under sixteen
(16) years of age and shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum fixed term of
imprisonment of twenty-five (25) years with a possible maximum term of life
if any two (2) of the following aggravating factors occurred during the com-
mission of or to accomplish the lewd conduct:


(1) The victim was kidnapped as defined in section 18-4501, Idaho Code;
(2) The defendant committed the crime of human trafficking, as defined
in section 18-8602, Idaho Code, against the victim;
(3) The defendant has been found guilty of or has plead guilty to any
offense requiring sex offender registration as set forth in section 18-8304,
Idaho Code;
(4) The defendant was, at the time of the offense, in a position of
trust, or had supervisory or disciplinary power over the victim by virtue
of the defendant's legal, professional, or occupational status and used the
position of trust or power to accomplish the lewd conduct; or the defendant
had, at the time of the offense, parental or custodial authority over the
victim and used the authority to accomplish the lewd conduct;
(5) The defendant tortured the victim by the intentional infliction of
extreme and prolonged pain with the intent to cause suffering or by the in-
fliction of extreme and prolonged acts of brutality irrespective of proof of
intent to cause suffering;
(6) The defendant used force or coercion;
(7) The defendant was armed with a weapon or any article used or fash-
ioned in a manner to lead the victim reasonably to believe it to be a weapon;
(8) The defendant caused great bodily injury, as defined in section
19-2520B, Idaho Code, or mutilation to the victim;
(9) The defendant's commission of the offense involved more than one
(1) victim;
(10) The defendant's commission of the offense involved more than one
(1) perpetrator;
(11) The victim contracted a sexually transmitted disease as a result of
the lewd conduct;
(12) The victim was impregnated as a result of the lewd conduct;
(13) The defendant willfully and unlawfully choked or attempted to
strangle the victim during the commission of the lewd conduct; or
(14) The defendant knew or had reason to know that the victim had a de-
velopmental disability as defined in section 66-402(5), Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 15, Title 18, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 18-1508C, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
18-1508C. AGGRAVATED LEWD CONDUCT WITH MINOR CHILD TWELVE OR UN-
DER. Any person eighteen (18) years of age or older who commits any lewd or
lascivious act or acts on or with the body or any part or member thereof of
a minor child twelve (12) years of age or under, including but not limited
to genital-genital contact, oral-genital contact, anal-genital contact,
oral-anal contact, manual-anal contact, or manual-genital contact, whether
between persons of the same or opposite sex, or who involves such minor child
in any act of bestiality or sadomasochism as defined in section 18-1507,
Idaho Code, when any of such acts are done with the intent of arousing, ap-
pealing to, or gratifying the lust or passions or sexual desires of such
person, such minor child, or a third party shall be guilty of felony aggra-
vated lewd conduct with a minor child twelve (12) years of age or under if any
two (2) of the following aggravating factors occurred during the commission
of or to accomplish the lewd conduct:


(1) The defendant engaged in three (3) or more incidents of lewd conduct
of a child involving the same victim on separate occasions;
(2) The defendant penetrated, however slight, the oral, anal, or vagi-
nal opening of the victim with a penis;
(3) The victim was kidnapped as defined in section 18-4501, Idaho Code;
(4) The defendant committed the crime of human trafficking, as defined
in section 18-8602, Idaho Code, against the victim;
(5) The defendant has been found guilty of or has plead guilty to any
offense requiring sex offender registration as set forth in section 18-8304,
Idaho Code;
(6) The defendant was, at the time of the offense, in a position of
trust, or had supervisory or disciplinary power over the victim by virtue
of the defendant's legal, professional, or occupational status and used the
position of trust or power to accomplish the lewd conduct; or the defendant
had, at the time of the offense, parental or custodial authority over the
victim and used the authority to accomplish the lewd conduct;
(7) The defendant tortured the victim by the intentional infliction of
extreme and prolonged pain with the intent to cause suffering or by the in-
fliction of extreme and prolonged acts of brutality irrespective of proof of
intent to cause suffering;
(8) The defendant used force or coercion;
(9) The defendant was armed with a weapon or any article used or fash-
ioned in a manner to lead the victim reasonably to believe it to be a weapon;
(10) The defendant caused great bodily injury, as defined in section
19-2520B, Idaho Code, or mutilation to the victim;
(11) The defendant's commission of the offense involved more than one
(1) victim;
(12) The defendant's commission of the offense involved more than one
(1) perpetrator;
(13) The victim contracted a sexually transmitted disease as a result of
the lewd conduct;
(14) The victim was impregnated as a result of the lewd conduct;
(15) The defendant willfully and unlawfully choked or attempted to
strangle the victim during the commission of the lewd conduct;
(16) The defendant provided alcohol, drugs, or other intoxicating sub-
stance to the victim; or
(17) The defendant knew or had reason to know that the victim had a de-
velopmental disability as defined in section 66-402(5), Idaho Code.
SECTION 3. That Chapter 15, Title 18, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 18-1508D, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
18-1508D. PUNISHMENT FOR AGGRAVATED LEWD CONDUCT WITH MINOR CHILD
TWELVE OR UNDER. Subject to the provisions of sections 19-2515 and 19-2515A,
Idaho Code, every person eighteen (18) years of age or older guilty of aggra-
vated lewd conduct with a minor child twelve (12) years of age or under shall
be punished by death or by imprisonment for life, provided that a sentence
of death shall not be imposed unless the prosecuting attorney filed written
notice of intent to seek the death penalty as required under the provisions
of section 18-4004A, Idaho Code, and provided further that whenever the


death penalty is not imposed the court shall impose a sentence. If a jury,
or the court if a jury is waived, finds three (3) statutory aggravating cir-
cumstances beyond a reasonable doubt but finds that the imposition of the
death penalty would be unjust, the court shall impose a fixed life sentence.
If a jury, or the court if a jury is waived, finds two (2) statutory aggra-
vating circumstances beyond a reasonable doubt and if the death penalty is
not sought, the court shall impose a life sentence with a minimum period of
confinement of not less than thirty (30) years during which period of con-
finement the offender shall not be eligible for parole or discharge or credit
or reduction of sentence for good conduct, except for meritorious service.
SECTION 4. That Chapter 15, Title 18, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 18-1508E, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
18-1508E. SEX OFFENDER REGISTRATION -- TERM OF CONFINEMENT. Any per-
son convicted of an offense as provided in section 18-1508, 18-1508B, or
18-1508C, Idaho Code, requiring sex offender registration as set forth in
section 18-8304, Idaho Code, and who is ordered to a fixed minimum term of
confinement shall not, during such term of confinement, be eligible for
parole, discharge, credit, reduction of sentence for good conduct, work
release, or furlough.
SECTION 5. That Section 18-4004A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-4004A. NOTICE OF INTENT TO SEEK DEATH PENALTY. (1) A sentence of
death shall not be imposed unless the prosecuting attorney filed written no-
tice of intent to seek the death penalty with the court and served the notice
upon the defendant or his attorney of record no later than sixty (60) days
after entry of a plea for murder in the first degree and no later than thirty
(30) days after entry of a plea for aggravated lewd conduct with a minor child
twelve (12) years of age or under. Any notice of intent to seek the death
penalty shall include a listing of the statutory aggravating circumstances
that the state will rely on in seeking the death penalty. The state may amend
its notice upon a showing of good cause at any time prior to trial. A notice
of intent to seek the death penalty may be withdrawn at any time prior to the
imposition of sentence. However, upon a showing of good cause, and a stip-
ulation by the state and the defendant and his attorney of record the court
may extend the time for the filing of the notice of intent to seek the death
penalty for a reasonable period of time.
(2) In the event that the prosecuting attorney does not file a notice of
intent to seek the death penalty or otherwise puts the court on notice that
the state does not intend to seek the death penalty, the court shall inform
potential jurors at the outset of jury selection that the death penalty is
not a sentencing option for the court or the jury.
SECTION 6. That Section 18-8304, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


18-8304. APPLICATION OF CHAPTER -- RULEMAKING AUTHORITY. (1) The pro-
visions of this chapter shall apply to any person who:
(a) On or after July 1, 1993, is convicted of the crime, or an attempt,
a solicitation, or a conspiracy to commit a crime provided for in sec-
tion 18-909 (assault with intent to commit rape or lewd and lascivious
conduct with a minor, but excluding mayhem, murder or robbery), 18-911
(battery with intent to commit rape or lewd and lascivious conduct with
a minor, but excluding mayhem, murder or robbery), 18-919 (sexual ex-
ploitation by a medical care provider), 18-925 (aggravated sexual bat-
tery), 18-1505B (sexual abuse and exploitation of a vulnerable adult),
18-1506 (sexual abuse of a child under sixteen years of age), 18-1506A
(ritualized abuse of a child), felony violations of 18-1507 (sexual
exploitation of a child), 18-1508 (lewd conduct with a minor child),
18-1508A (sexual battery of a minor child sixteen or seventeen years of
age), 18-1508B (aggravated lewd conduct with a minor child under six-
teen), 18-1508C (aggravated lewd conduct with a minor child twelve or
under), 18-1509A (enticing a child over the internet), 18-4003(d) (mur-
der committed in perpetration of rape), 18-4116 (indecent exposure, but
excluding a misdemeanor conviction), 18-4502 (first degree kidnapping
committed for the purpose of rape or for committing any lewd and las-
civious act upon any child under the age of sixteen, or for purposes of
sexual gratification or arousal), 18-4503 (second degree kidnapping
where the victim is an unrelated minor child), 18-5605 (detention for
commercial sexual activity), 18-5609 (inducing a child into commercial
sexual activity), 18-5610 (utilizing a child for commercial sexual
activity), 18-5611 (inducing a child to engage in commercial sexual
activity), 18-6101 (rape, but excluding 18-6101(1) where the defendant
is eighteen years of age), 18-6110 (sexual contact with a prisoner),
18-6601 (incest), 18-6602 (sexual abuse of an animal), 18-6603 (sexual
abuse of human remains), 18-6604 (forcible penetration by use of a for-
eign object), 18-6605 (video voyeurism where the victim is a minor or
upon a second or subsequent conviction), 18-7804 (if the racketeering
act involves kidnapping of a minor) or chapter 86, title 18 (human traf-
ficking), Idaho Code.
(b) On or after July 1, 1993, has been convicted of any crime, an at-
tempt, a solicitation or a conspiracy to commit a crime in another ju-
risdiction, including military courts, or who has a foreign conviction
that is substantially equivalent to the offenses listed in paragraphs
(a) or (f) of this subsection and enters this state to establish resi-
dence or for employment purposes or to attend, on a full-time or part-
time basis, any public or private educational institution including any
secondary school, trade or professional institution or institution of
higher education.
(c) Has been convicted of any crime, an attempt, a solicitation or a
conspiracy to commit a crime in another jurisdiction, including mil-
itary courts, or who has a foreign conviction that is substantially
equivalent to the offenses listed in paragraphs (a) or (f) of this sub-
section and was required to register as a sex offender in any other state
or jurisdiction when he established residency in Idaho.


(d) Pleads guilty to or has been found guilty of a crime covered in this
chapter prior to July 1, 1993, and the person, as a result of the of-
fense, is incarcerated in a county jail facility or a penal facility or
is under probation or parole supervision, on or after July 1, 1993.
(e) Is a nonresident regularly employed or working in Idaho or is a stu-
dent in the state of Idaho and was convicted, found guilty or pleaded
guilty to a crime covered by this chapter and, as a result of such con-
viction, finding or plea, is required to register in his state of resi-
dence.
(f) On or after July 1, 1993, is convicted of the crime or an attempt,
solicitation, or conspiracy to commit the infamous crime against na-
ture, a felony offense formerly codified in chapter 66, title 18, Idaho
Code, and whose conviction is entered before July 1, 2022.
(2) An offender shall not be required to comply with the registration
provisions of this chapter while incarcerated in a correctional institution
of the department of correction, a county jail facility, committed to the de-
partment of juvenile corrections or committed to a mental health institution
of the department of health and welfare.
(3) A conviction for purposes of this chapter means that the person has
pled guilty or has been found guilty, notwithstanding the form of the judg-
ment or withheld judgment.
(4) The department shall have authority to promulgate rules to imple-
ment the provisions of this chapter.
SECTION 7. That Section 19-2515, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
19-2515. SENTENCE IN CAPITAL CASES -- SPECIAL SENTENCING PROCEEDING
-- STATUTORY AGGRAVATING CIRCUMSTANCES -- SPECIAL VERDICT OR WRITTEN FIND-
INGS. (1) Except as provided in section 19-2515A, Idaho Code, a person con-
victed of murder in the first degree or aggravated lewd conduct with a minor
child twelve (12) years of age or under shall be liable for the imposition of
the penalty of death if such person killed, intended a killing, or acted with
reckless indifference to human life, irrespective of whether such person di-
rectly committed the acts that caused death or the aggravated lewd conduct.
(2) Where a person is sentenced to serve a term in the penitentiary,
after conviction of a crime which falls within the provisions of section
20-1005, Idaho Code, except in cases where the court retains jurisdiction,
the comments and arguments of the counsel for the state and the defendant
relative to the sentencing and the comments of the judge relative to the
sentencing shall be recorded. If the comments are recorded electronically,
they need not be transcribed. Otherwise, they shall be transcribed by the
court reporter.
(3) Where a person is convicted of an offense which may be punishable by
death, a sentence of death shall not be imposed unless:
(a) A notice of intent to seek the death penalty was filed and served as
provided in section 18-4004A, Idaho Code; and
(b) The jury, or the court if a jury is waived, finds beyond a reasonable
doubt at least one (1) statutory aggravating circumstance for murder
and at least three (3) statutory aggravating circumstances, as listed
in subsection (10) of this section, for aggravated lewd conduct with a


minor child twelve (12) years of age or under. Where a statutory ag-
gravating circumstance is found, the defendant shall be sentenced to
death unless mitigating circumstances which may be presented are found
to be sufficiently compelling that the death penalty would be unjust.
The jury shall not direct imposition of a sentence of death unless it
unanimously finds at least one (1) statutory aggravating circumstance
and unanimously determines that the penalty of death should be imposed.
(4) Notwithstanding any court rule to the contrary, when a defendant is
adjudicated guilty of murder in the first degree or aggravated lewd conduct
with a minor child twelve (12) years of age or under, whether by acceptance of
a plea of guilty, by verdict of a jury, or by decision of the trial court sit-
ting without a jury, no presentence investigation shall be conducted; pro-
vided however, that if a special sentencing proceeding is not held or if a
special sentencing proceeding is held but no statutory aggravating circum-
stance has been proven beyond a reasonable doubt, the court may order that a
presentence investigation be conducted.
(5)(a) If a person is adjudicated guilty of murder in the first degree
or aggravated lewd conduct with a minor child twelve (12) years of age or
under, whether by acceptance of a plea of guilty, by verdict of a jury,
or by decision of the trial court sitting without a jury, and a notice
of intent to seek the death penalty was filed and served as provided in
section 18-4004A, Idaho Code, a special sentencing proceeding shall be
held promptly for the purpose of hearing all relevant evidence and ar-
guments of counsel in aggravation and mitigation of the offense. Infor-
mation concerning the victim and the impact that the death or aggravated
lewd conduct of the victim has had on the victim's family is relevant and
admissible. Such information shall be designed to demonstrate the vic-
tim's uniqueness as an individual human being and the resultant loss to
the community or impact caused by the victim's death or lewd conduct of
the victim. Characterizations and opinions about the crime, the defen-
dant and the appropriate sentence shall not be permitted as part of any
victim impact information. The special sentencing proceeding shall be
conducted before a jury unless a jury is waived by the defendant with the
consent of the prosecuting attorney.
(b) If the defendant's guilt was determined by a jury verdict, the same
jury shall hear the special sentencing proceeding; provided however,
that if it is impracticable to reconvene the same jury to hear the spe-
cial sentencing proceeding due to an insufficient number of jurors, the
trial court may dismiss that jury and convene a new jury of twelve (12)
persons, plus alternate jurors as the trial court deems necessary pur-
suant to section 19-1904, Idaho Code.
(c) If the defendant's guilt was determined by a plea of guilty or by a
decision of the trial court sitting without a jury, or if a retrial of
the special sentencing proceeding is necessary for any reason includ-
ing, but not limited to, a mistrial in a previous special sentencing
proceeding or as a consequence of a remand from an appellate court, the
trial court shall impanel a jury of twelve (12) persons, plus alternate
jurors as the trial court deems necessary pursuant to section 19-1904,
Idaho Code, unless such jury is waived.


(d) If a special sentencing proceeding is conducted before a newly im-
paneled jury pursuant to the provisions of subsection (5)(b) or (5)(c)
of this section, the state and the defense may present evidence to in-
form the jury of the nature and circumstances of the murder or aggra-
vated lewd conduct for which the defendant was convicted. The newly im-
paneled jury shall be instructed that the defendant has previously been
found guilty of first-degree murder or aggravated lewd conduct with a
minor child twelve (12) years of age or under and that the jury's purpose
is limited to making findings relevant for sentencing.
(6) At the special sentencing proceeding, the state and the defendant
shall be entitled to present all relevant evidence in aggravation and miti-
gation. Disclosure of evidence to be relied on in the sentencing proceeding
shall be made in accordance with Idaho criminal rule 16. Evidence admitted
at trial shall be considered and need not be repeated at the sentencing hear-
ing.
(7) The jury shall be informed as follows:
(a) If the jury finds that a statutory aggravating circumstance exists
and no mitigating circumstances exist which would make the imposition
of the death penalty unjust, the defendant will be sentenced to death by
the court.
(b) If the jury finds the existence of a statutory aggravating circum-
stance but finds that the existence of mitigating circumstances makes
the imposition of the death penalty unjust or the jury cannot unani-
mously agree on whether the existence of mitigating circumstances makes
the imposition of the death penalty unjust, the defendant will be sen-
tenced to a term of life imprisonment without the possibility of parole;
and
(c) If the jury does not find the existence of a statutory aggravating
circumstance or if the jury cannot unanimously agree on the existence of
a statutory aggravating circumstance, the defendant will be sentenced
by the court to a term of life imprisonment with a fixed term of not less
than ten (10) years for first-degree murder or thirty (30) years for ag-
gravated lewd conduct with a minor child twelve (12) years of age or un-
der.
(8) Upon the conclusion of the evidence and arguments in mitigation and
aggravation:
(a) With regard to each statutory aggravating circumstance alleged by
the state, the jury shall return a special verdict stating:
(i) Whether the statutory aggravating circumstance has been
proven beyond a reasonable doubt; and
(ii) If the statutory aggravating circumstance has been proven
beyond a reasonable doubt, whether all mitigating circumstances,
when weighed against the aggravating circumstance, are suffi-
ciently compelling that the death penalty would be unjust.
(b) If a jury has been waived, the court shall:
(i) Make written findings setting forth any statutory aggravat-
ing circumstance found beyond a reasonable doubt;
(ii) Set forth in writing any mitigating circumstances consid-
ered; and


(iii) Upon weighing all mitigating circumstances against each
statutory aggravating circumstance separately, determine whether
mitigating circumstances are found to be sufficiently compelling
that the death penalty would be unjust and detail in writing its
reasons for so finding.
(9) The following are statutory aggravating circumstances, at least
one (1) of which must be found to exist beyond a reasonable doubt before a
sentence of death can be imposed for murder in the first degree:
(a) The defendant was previously convicted of another murder.
(b) At the time the murder was committed the defendant also committed
another murder.
(c) The defendant knowingly created a great risk of death to many per-
sons.
(d) The murder was committed for remuneration or the promise of remu-
neration or the defendant employed another to commit the murder for re-
muneration or the promise of remuneration.
(e) The murder was especially heinous, atrocious or cruel, manifesting
exceptional depravity.
(f) By the murder, or circumstances surrounding its commission, the de-
fendant exhibited utter disregard for human life.
(g) The murder was committed in the perpetration of, or attempt to per-
petrate, arson, rape, robbery, burglary, kidnapping or mayhem and the
defendant killed, intended a killing, or acted with reckless indiffer-
ence to human life.
(h) The murder was committed in the perpetration of, or attempt to
perpetrate, lewd and lascivious conduct with a minor, sexual abuse of
a child under sixteen (16) years of age, ritualized abuse of a child,
sexual exploitation of a child, sexual battery of a minor child sixteen
(16) or seventeen (17) years of age, or forcible sexual penetration by
use of a foreign object, and the defendant killed, intended a killing,
or acted with reckless indifference to human life.
(i) The defendant, by his conduct, whether such conduct was before,
during or after the commission of the murder at hand, has exhibited a
propensity to commit murder which will probably constitute a continuing
threat to society.
(j) The murder was committed against a former or present peace officer,
executive officer, officer of the court, judicial officer or prosecut-
ing attorney because of the exercise of official duty or because of the
victim's former or present official status.
(k) The murder was committed against a witness or potential witness in a
criminal or civil legal proceeding because of such proceeding.
(10) The following are statutory aggravating circumstances, at least
three (3) of which must be found to have existed during the commission of or
to accomplish the lewd conduct beyond a reasonable doubt before a sentence
of death can be imposed for aggravated lewd conduct with a minor child twelve
(12) years of age or under, as provided in section 18-1508C, Idaho Code:
(a) The defendant engaged in three (3) or more incidents of lewd conduct
of a child involving the same victim on separate occasions;
(b) The defendant penetrated, however slight, the oral, anal, or vagi-
nal opening of the victim with a penis;


(c) The victim was kidnapped as defined in section 18-4501, Idaho Code;
(d) The defendant committed the crime of human trafficking, as defined
in section 18-8602, Idaho Code, against the victim;
(e) The defendant has been found guilty of or has plead guilty to any
offense requiring sex offender registration as set forth in section
18-8304, Idaho Code;
(f) The defendant was, at the time of the offense, in a position of
trust, or had supervisory or disciplinary power over the victim by
virtue of the defendant's legal, professional, or occupational status
and used the position of trust or power to accomplish the lewd conduct;
or the defendant had, at the time of the offense, parental or custodial
authority over the victim and used the authority to accomplish the lewd
conduct;
(g) The defendant tortured the victim by the intentional infliction of
extreme and prolonged pain with the intent to cause suffering or by the
infliction of extreme and prolonged acts of brutality irrespective of
proof of intent to cause suffering;
(h) The defendant used force or coercion;
(i) The defendant was armed with a weapon or any article used or fash-
ioned in a manner to lead the victim reasonably to believe it to be a
weapon;
(j) The defendant caused great bodily injury, as defined in section
19-2520B, Idaho Code, or mutilation to the victim;
(k) The defendant's commission of the offense involved more than one
(1) victim;
(l) The defendant's commission of the offense involved more than one
(1) perpetrator;
(m) The victim contracted a sexually transmitted disease as a result of
the lewd conduct;
(n) The victim was impregnated as a result of the lewd conduct;
(o) The defendant willfully and unlawfully choked or attempted to
strangle the victim during the commission of the lewd conduct;
(p) The defendant provided alcohol, drugs, or other intoxicating sub-
stances to the victim; or
(q) The defendant knew or had reason to know that the victim had a devel-
opmental disability as defined in section 66-402(5), Idaho Code.
SECTION 8. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act are hereby declared
to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such
provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason,
such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of
this act.
SECTION 9. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.